Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-154
Employable recipients; rules and regulations.

Any county which establishes a vocational, rehabilitation, job training, or community service program shall adopt and promulgate written rules and regulations to ensure fair and equitable treatment of employable recipients of general assistance.

Laws 1990, LB 422, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 227, § 4.